Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1974
Resignation of directors.

(a) A director may resign at any time by delivering written notice to the board of directors, its presiding officer, or to the president or secretary.

(b) A resignation is effective when the notice is effective unless the notice specifies a later effective date. If a resignation is made effective at a later date, the board may fill the pending vacancy before the effective date if the board provides that the successor does not take office until the effective date.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 74.